Connecticut, session 2026, SB00252.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a
Regulation Sunset Commission, which shall be part of the Executive
Department and shall review the existing regulations of Connecticut
state agencies and recommend the elimination of outdated,
unnecessary, overly burdensome or obsolete regulations.
(b) The commission shall consist of the following members: (1) One
appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives; (2) one
appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate; (3) one appointed
by the majority leader of the House of Representatives; (4) one
appointed by the majority leader of the Senate; (5) one appointed by the
minority leader of the House of Representatives; (6) one appointed by
the minority leader of the Senate; and (7) the Secretary of the Office of
Policy and Management, or the secretary's designee.
(c) All initial appointments to the commission shall be made not later
LCO No. 1433 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 252
than July 1, 2026, and shall terminate on June 30, 2028, regardless of
when the initial appointment was made.
(d) The Governor shall select the chairpersons of the commission
from among the members of the commission. Such chairpersons shall
schedule the first meeting of the commission, which shall be held not
later than July 1, 2026.
(e) The Office of Policy and Management shall provide
administrative support to the commission.
(f) Appointed members of the commission shall serve for two-year
terms which shall commence on the date of appointment, except as
provided in subsection (c) of this section. Members shall continue to
serve until their successors are appointed.
(g) Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority. Any
vacancy occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled for the
balance of the unexpired term.
(h) A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of any business.
(i) The members of the commission shall serve without
compensation, but shall, within the limits of available funds, be
reimbursed for expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of
their duties.
(j) The commission shall have the following powers and duties: (1) To
examine all regulations published on the eRegulations system to
determine which should be repealed; (2) to hold public hearings, and
the commission may require the attendance of any department head, as
defined in section 4-5 of the general statutes, to testify concerning
regulations under the purview of such department head at such hearing;
(3) to obtain from any executive department, board, commission or
other agency of the state such assistance and data as necessary and
LCO No. 1433 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 252
available to carry out the purposes of this section; (4) to accept any gift,
donation or bequest for the purpose of performing the duties described
in this section; and (5) to perform such other acts as may be necessary
and appropriate to carry out the duties described in this section. The
commission shall meet at least quarterly.
(k) Not later than January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the
commission shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the Governor and the standing
legislative regulation review committee which shall include, but need
not be limited to, (1) a listing of any regulations that the commission is
recommending be repealed, and a brief explanation of why; and (2)
recommendations for any policy changes and amendments to the
general statutes necessary to effectuate such repeal.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) Not later than January 1, 2027,
the standing legislative regulation review committee shall establish and
maintain on its Internet web site, a portal through which members of
the public may submit requests to amend or eliminate existing
regulations of Connecticut state agencies. Any such requests shall be
transmitted to the standing legislative regulation review committee and
the committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of the subject
matter of the regulations concerned for consideration and if applicable,
to determine whether any amendments to the general statutes are
necessary to effectuate such amendments or repeal.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section